Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.350

Professional development learning opportunities—Partnerships.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Create partnerships with the educational service districts or public or private institutions of higher education with approved educator preparation programs to develop and deliver professional development learning opportunities for educators that fulfill the goals and address the activities described in *sections 3 through 6 of this act and RCW 28A.415.360. The partnerships shall:

(a) Support school districts by providing professional development leadership, courses, and consultation services to school districts in their implementation of professional development activities, including the activities described in *sections 3 through 6 of this act and RCW 28A.415.360; and

(b) Support one another in the delivery of state-level and regional-level professional development activities such as state conferences and regional accountability institutes; and

(2) Enter into a performance agreement with each educational service district to clearly articulate partner responsibilities and assure fidelity for the delivery of professional development initiatives including job-embedded practices. Components of such performance agreements shall include:

(a) Participation in the development of various professional development workshops, programs, and activities;

(b) Characteristics and qualifications of professional development staff supported by the program;

(c) Methods to ensure consistent delivery of professional development services; and

(d) Reporting responsibilities related to services provided, program participation, outcomes, and recommendations for service improvement.

[ 2009 c 539 s 4; 2007 c 402 s 7.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Sections 3 through 6 of this act were vetoed.

Effective date—2009 c 539: See note following RCW 28A.655.200.

Captions not law—2007 c 402: See note following RCW 28A.415.340.